Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.086

Washington state school directors' association—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply to officers and employees of the Washington state school directors' association.

[ 1983 c 187 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1983 c 187: See RCW 28A.345.902.